Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1352.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1027. Issuance of Licenses by Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.--(a) Notwithstanding section 1009, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall issue to a provider a license for a term of two years if the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs determines that the provider meets the following conditions:(1) The provider's license is in good standing and has not been in provisional status for at least two consecutive years.(2) The provider has received a current multiyear 12345678910111213141516171819 accreditation from a national accreditation organization. The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall accept a final accreditation report from the accrediting body, or a true copy thereof furnished by the provider, as evidence that the provider meets the applicable licensure requirements.(3) The process for the accreditation includes a review to determine whether the provider's programs and services meet defined standards of quality in health and human services and is maintained through ongoing conformance and review, including a survey at the end of the accreditation period to determine whether accreditation should continue.(4) The provider agrees that if the provider fails to maintain the accreditation, the provider will notify the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs no later than fourteen days after the lapse in accreditation. If the provider fails to provide the notice as required by this paragraph, the provider shall be subject to standard licensure requirements, including inspection and issuance of a one-year license at the next renewal or earlier action as provided by law.(b) If the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs issues a two-year license to a provider under this section, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall conduct a single licensing inspection of the provider for each two-year licensing period. The following apply to an inspection under this subsection:(1) The inspection shall constitute the required licensure inspection for that period and may not be conducted as separate annual inspections.(2) The scope and depth of the inspection shall be equivalent to that of a standard one-year licensing inspection 20260SB1352PN1771 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and may not be expanded on the basis that the inspection covers a two-year period.(3) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs may utilize representative sampling of policies, procedures and patient records from the licensing period in conducting the inspection.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs to conduct inspections in response to complaints or other reports made to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1352PN1771 - 3 - 12345678910